Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Chapter 17. Mortgage Loan Originators.

§ 6.2-1700.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Act”
means the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act, Title V (§ 1501 et seq.) of the Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008, P.L. 110-289.

“Administrative or clerical tasks”
means the receipt, collection, and distribution of information common for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan in the mortgage industry and communication with the consumer to obtain information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan.

“Covered financial institution”
has the same meaning as that term is defined in 12 C.F.R. § 1007.102.

“Dwelling”
means a residential structure or mobile home that contains one to four family housing units, or individual units of condominiums or cooperatives.

“Employee”
means an individual (i) whose manner and means of performance of work are subject to the right of control of, or are controlled by, a person and (ii) whose compensation for federal income tax purposes is reported, or required to be reported, on a W-2 form issued by the controlling person.

“Immediate family member”
means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent, or grandchild. This includes stepparents, stepchildren, stepsiblings, and adoptive relationships.

“Licensee”
means an individual licensed under this chapter.

“Loan processor or underwriter”
means an individual who, with respect to the origination of a residential mortgage loan, performs clerical or support duties at the direction of and subject to the supervision and instruction of a licensee or a registered mortgage loan originator. For the purposes of this definition, clerical or support duties include (i) the receipt, collection, distribution, and analysis of information common for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan and (ii) communication with a consumer to obtain the information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan, to the extent that such communication does not include offering or negotiating loan rates or terms, or counseling consumers about residential mortgage loan rates or terms.

“Mortgage loan originator”
means an individual who (i) takes an application for or offers or negotiates the terms of a residential mortgage loan in which the dwelling is or will be located in the Commonwealth or (ii) represents to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information, including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists, or other promotional items, that such individual can or will perform any of the activities described in clause (i).

“Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry”
or

“Registry”

means a mortgage licensing system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing and registration of mortgage loan originators.

“Nontraditional mortgage product”
means any mortgage product other than a 30-year fixed rate mortgage.

“Real estate brokerage activities”
means any activity that involves offering or providing real estate brokerage services to the public, including (i) acting as a real estate broker, real estate agent, or real estate salesperson for a buyer, seller, lessor, or lessee of real property; (ii) bringing together parties interested in the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of real property; (iii) negotiating any portion of a contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of real property, other than in connection with providing financing with respect to any such transaction; (iv) engaging in any activity for which a person is required to be licensed or registered as a real estate broker, real estate agent, or real estate salesperson; and (v) offering to engage in any activity or act in any capacity described in clauses (i) through (iv).

“Registered mortgage loan originator”
means any individual who (i) takes an application for or offers or negotiates the terms of a residential mortgage loan in which the dwelling is or will be located in the Commonwealth, (ii) is an employee of a covered financial institution, and (iii) is registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through, the Registry.

“Residential mortgage loan”
means any loan primarily for personal, family, or household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other equivalent consensual security interest on a dwelling or residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling.

“Unique identifier”
means a number or other identifier assigned by protocols established by the Registry that permanently identifies a mortgage loan originator.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.1; 2010, c. 794; 2011, cc. 301, 435; 2012, cc. 52, 187; 2013, cc. 20, 380; 2014, cc. 295, 343; 2019, c. 740.

Cross references.

For the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act, Title V (§ 1501 et seq.) of the Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008, P.L. 110-289, referred to in the definition of “Act” above, see 12 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.

Editor’s note.

For the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act, Title V (§ 1501 et seq.) of the Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008, P.L. 110-289, referred to in the definition of “Act” above, see 12 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 301 added clause (ix) in the definition of “Mortgage loan originator.”

The 2011 amendment by c. 435, in the first sentence in the definitions for “Mortgage loan originator” and “Registered mortgage loan originator,” substituted “in which the dwelling is or will be located” for “that is secured by real property located.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 52 and 187 are identical, and added the paragraphs defining “Dwelling” and “Residential mortgage loan”; inserted “with respect to the origination of a residential mortgage loan” in the paragraph defining “Loan processor or underwriter”; rewrote the paragraphs defining “Mortgage loan originator” and “Real estate brokerage activities”; deleted “as defined in § 1503(8) of the Act” following “residential mortgage loan” in the paragraph defining “Registered mortgage loan originator”; added “that permanently identifies a mortgage loan originator” at the end of the paragraph defining “Unique identifier”; and made related changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 20 and 380 are identical, and added the paragraphs defining “Covered financial institution” and “Employee”; deleted the paragraphs defining “Depository institution,” “Federal banking agencies” and “Individual loan servicer”; in the paragraph defining “Loan processor or underwriter,” substituted “registered mortgage loan originator” for “person exempt from licensing under this chapter” at the end of the first sentence; in the paragraph defining “Mortgage loan originator,” inserted the clause (i) designator and clause (ii), and made a related change; and in the paragraph defining “Registered mortgage loan originator,” substituted “Commonwealth, (ii) is an employee of a covered financial institution and (iii) is” for “Commonwealth and is an employee of (a) a depository institution, (b) a subsidiary that is owned and controlled by a depository institution and regulated by a federal banking agency, or (c) an institution regulated by the Farm Credit Administration, and (ii) is.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 295 and 343 are identical, and in the definition of “Licensee” inserted “including an individual who has been issued a transitional mortgage loan originator license” and added the definition of “Transitional mortgage loan originator license.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 740, in the definition of “Licensee,” deleted “including an individual who has been issued a transitional mortgage loan originator license”; in the definition of “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry,” substituted “Multistate” for “Mortgage”; and deleted the definition of “Transitional mortgage loan originator license,” which read: “ ‘Transitional mortgage loan originator license’ means a license issued under this chapter to engage in business as a mortgage loan originator for a period of no more than 120 days, during which time the individual may fulfill the pre-licensing education and written test requirements described in §§

6.2-1708

and

6.2-1709

and apply for a mortgage loan originator license”; and made stylistic changes.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-413 Contract Clause Pertaining to Payment of Purchase Price; No. 16-601 Deed of Trust Note — Simple Form, et seq.

§ 6.2-1701.
License requirement.

Except as otherwise provided in §

6.2-1701.3

, no individual shall engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator unless such individual has first obtained and maintains annually a license under this chapter.

The following shall be exempt from licensing and other provisions of this chapter:

Any individual engaged solely as a loan processor or underwriter. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an individual acting as an independent contractor may not engage in residential mortgage loan origination activities as a loan processor or underwriter unless such individual has first obtained and maintains annually a mortgage loan originator license;

Any individual who only performs administrative or clerical tasks on behalf of a mortgage loan originator;

Any individual who only performs real estate brokerage activities and is licensed or registered in accordance with applicable law, unless the individual is compensated directly or indirectly by the lender, a mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such lender, mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator;

Any individual solely involved in extensions of credit relating to timeshare plans, as that term is defined in 11 U.S.C. § 101 (53D);

A registered mortgage loan originator;

Any individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan with or on behalf of an immediate family member of the individual;

Any individual who acts as a loan originator in providing financing for the sale of that individual’s own residence;

A licensed attorney, provided that the attorney’s mortgage loan origination activities are: (i) considered by the Supreme Court of Virginia to be part of the authorized practice of law within the Commonwealth, (ii) carried out within an attorney-client relationship, and (iii) accomplished by the attorney in compliance with all applicable laws, rules, ethics, and standards;

Any employee of federal, state, or local government, or a housing finance agency, who acts as a mortgage loan originator only pursuant to his official duties of employment. For the purposes of this subdivision, “local government” means any county, city, or town or other local or regional political subdivision; and

Any employee of a bona fide nonprofit organization, as determined by the Commission in accordance with §

6.2-1701.1

, who acts as a mortgage loan originator only (i) pursuant to his official duties of employment and (ii) with respect to residential mortgage loans with terms that are favorable to a borrower.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.2; 2010, c. 794; 2012, cc. 52, 187; 2013, cc. 20, 380; 2014, cc. 295, 343; 2019, c. 740.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 52 and 187 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 20 and 380 are identical, and rewrote subdivisions B 1, B 7 and B 8; substituted “mortgage loan originator” for “person licensed or exempt pursuant to Chapter 16 (§

6.2-1600

et seq.) or on behalf of any individual licensed pursuant to this chapter” in subdivision B 2; inserted “directly or indirectly” in subdivision B 3; deleted former subdivision B 9, which read: “Any individual acting as an individual loan servicer;” and redesignated the following subdivisions accordingly.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 295 and 343 are identical, and substituted “Except as otherwise provided in §

6.2-1701.2

, no” for “No” at the beginning of subsection A.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 740, in subsection A, substituted “6.2-1701.3” for “6.2-1701.2.”

§ 6.2-1701.1.
Bona fide nonprofit organizations.

The Commission shall prescribe by regulation (i) the procedures and criteria that it will use to determine whether an organization is a bona fide nonprofit organization and (ii) the information and fees that must be submitted by an organization to the Commission in connection with a request for a determination under this section. In establishing the criteria for a bona fide nonprofit organization, the Commission shall give consideration to the criteria that have been adopted by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau or any other federal agency with rulemaking authority under the Act.

The Commission shall, as often as it deems necessary, investigate and periodically examine the business activities, books, and records of any bona fide nonprofit organization insofar as they pertain to the criteria that the Commission has prescribed pursuant to clause (i) of subsection A. In the course of such investigations and examinations, the organization being investigated or examined shall, upon demand of the person making such investigation or examination, afford full access to all books, records, and information that the person making such investigation or examination deems necessary.

The Commission may, after providing notice and an opportunity for a hearing, revoke its determination that an organization is a bona fide nonprofit organization if it finds that the organization no longer meets the criteria prescribed by the Commission pursuant to clause (i) of subsection A.

History.

2012, cc. 52, 187.

§ 6.2-1701.2.
Repealed by Acts 2019, c. 740, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to temporary authority to act as a mortgage loan originator, see §

6.2-1701.3

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

6.2-1701.2

, pertaining to transitional mortgage loan originator license, derived from 2014, cc. 295, 343.

§ 6.2-1701.3.
Temporary authority to act as a mortgage loan originator.

An individual shall be deemed to have temporary authority to act as a mortgage loan originator in the Commonwealth to the extent authorized by, and subject to the terms and conditions prescribed in, § 1518 of the Act.

A mortgage lender or mortgage broker that employs an individual who is deemed to have temporary authority to act as a mortgage loan originator in the Commonwealth pursuant to this section shall be subject to the requirements of this chapter and Chapter 16 (§

6.2-1600

et seq.) to the same extent that such mortgage lender or mortgage broker would be subject to such requirements if such individual were a licensed mortgage loan originator under this chapter.

An individual who is deemed to have temporary authority to act as a mortgage loan originator in the Commonwealth pursuant to this section and acts as a mortgage loan originator shall be subject to the requirements of this chapter to the same extent as if such individual was a licensed mortgage loan originator under this chapter.

History.

2019, c. 740.

Editor’s note.

For “§ 1518 of the Act” referred to in subsection A, see 12 U.S.C. § 5117.

§ 6.2-1702.
Application for license; form; content; fee.

An application for a license under this chapter shall be on a form provided by the Registry.

The application shall set forth:

The name and residential address of the applicant;

The address of the applicant’s employer or the address where the applicant will act as a mortgage loan originator, as applicable; and

Such other information concerning the financial responsibility, background, experience, and activities of the applicant as the Commissioner may require.

The application shall be accompanied by payment of an application fee in an amount not to exceed $150, or a lesser amount as may be prescribed by the Commission. The application fee shall be in addition to any other fees payable by the applicant, including but not limited to fees for pre-licensing education and testing, fingerprinting, criminal background checks, credit reports, or administrative fees charged by the Registry.

The application fee shall not be refundable in any event. The fee shall not be abated by surrender, suspension, or revocation of the license.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.3; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1703.
Bond required.

The application for a license shall be accompanied by a bond to be filed with the Commission with corporate surety authorized to execute such bond in the Commonwealth, the form of which shall be approved by the Commission.

If the applicant is not an employee or exclusive agent of a person licensed or exempt from licensing under Chapter 16 (§

6.2-1600

et seq.), the bond shall be an individual surety bond for the applicant; or

If the applicant is an employee or exclusive agent of a person licensed or exempt from licensing under Chapter 16 (§

6.2-1600

et seq.), the bond shall be a surety bond filed by such person covering all such employees and exclusive agents holding or applying for a license as a mortgage loan originator.

The amount of the bond shall be $25,000, or such greater sum as the Commission may require based on the total dollar amount of residential mortgage loans originated in the preceding calendar year by (i) the applicant, in the case of the bond referred to in subdivision A 1 or (ii) the person licensed or exempt from licensing under Chapter 16 (§

6.2-1600

et seq.), in the case of the bond referred to in subdivision A 2. A bond already filed with the Commission pursuant to §

6.2-1604

may be applied toward the minimum bond required by this section, subject to approval by the Commission. In the case of the bond referred to in subdivision A 2, it shall be the responsibility of the person licensed or exempt from licensing under Chapter 16 (§

6.2-1600

et seq.) to provide information, in a form satisfactory to the Commission, sufficient for determining and verifying the total dollar amount of residential mortgage loans originated in the preceding calendar year.

Such bond shall be continuously maintained thereafter in full force.

Such bond shall be conditioned upon the licensee: (i) performing all written agreements with borrowers or prospective borrowers; (ii) correctly and accurately accounting for all funds received by him in the course of his business activities as a licensee; and (iii) conducting himself in conformity with this chapter and all applicable laws and regulations.

Any person who may be damaged by noncompliance of a licensee with any condition of such bond may proceed on such bond against the principal or surety thereon, or both, to recover damages. The aggregate liability under the bond shall not exceed the penal sum of the bond.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.4; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1704.
Mortgage loan originator background checks.

In connection with an application for licensing as a mortgage loan originator, the applicant shall furnish to the Registry information concerning the applicant’s identity, including fingerprints for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation or any federal or state governmental agency or entity authorized to receive such information for a state, national, and international criminal history background check, as prescribed by the Commission.

The applicant shall also submit personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the Registry, including submission of authorization for the Registry and the Commission to obtain (i) an independent credit report from a consumer reporting agency described in § 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. § 1681 et seq.), and (ii) information related to any administrative, civil, or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact that the Federal Bureau of Investigation may be required to maintain, the Commission may use the Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from, and distributing information to, the Department of Justice, other governmental agency, or any other source.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.5; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1705.
Coordination of licensing.

In connection with its administration and enforcement of this chapter, the Commission is authorized to establish agreements or contracts with the Registry or other entities designated by the Registry to collect, distribute, and maintain information and records, and to process transaction fees and other fees, related to licensees and other persons subject to this chapter. When establishing such agreements or contracts the Commission shall not be subject to the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.). Notwithstanding the provisions of §

6.2-101

, the Commission shall report regularly to the Registry any violations of this chapter, enforcement actions, and license status changes. The Commission shall report to the Registry only those violations, actions, and license status changes effected by final order of the Commission or by the Commissioner pursuant to his delegated authority.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.6; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1706.
Qualifications.

Upon the filing and investigation of an application for a license and compliance by the applicant with all applicable provisions of this chapter, the Commission shall issue and deliver to the applicant the license applied for to engage in business under this chapter if it finds that the financial responsibility, character, and general fitness of the applicant are such as to warrant belief that the licensee will act as a mortgage loan originator efficiently and fairly, in the public interest, and in accordance with law. If the Commission fails to make such findings, no license shall be issued and the Commissioner shall notify the applicant of the denial and the reasons for such denial. The Commission shall not base a license denial, in whole or in part, on an applicant’s credit score, nor shall it use a credit report as the sole basis for license denial.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.7; 2010, c. 794; 2014, cc. 295, 343; 2019, c. 740.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 295 and 343 are identical, and inserted “including an application for a transitional mortgage loan originator license” in the first sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 740 deleted “including an application for a transitional mortgage loan originator license” following “a license”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 6.2-1707.
Other conditions for mortgage loan originator licensing.

In addition to the findings required by §

6.2-1706

, the Commission shall not issue a mortgage loan originator license unless it finds that:

The applicant has never had a mortgage loan originator license revoked by any governmental authority;

The applicant has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in a domestic, foreign, or military court (i) during the seven-year period preceding the application for licensing and registration; or (ii) at any time preceding such date of application if such felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, breach of trust, or money laundering;

The applicant has completed the pre-licensing education requirement described in §

6.2-1708

;

The applicant has passed a written test that meets the test requirement described in §

6.2-1709

; and

The applicant has become registered through, and obtained a unique identifier from, the Registry.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.8; 2010, c. 794; 2014, cc. 295, 343; 2019, c. 740.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 295 and 343 are identical, and added the subsection A designation and subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 740 deleted the designation for former subsection A; and deleted former subsection B, which read: “In addition to the findings required by §

6.2-1706

, the Commission shall not issue a transitional mortgage loan originator license unless it (i) makes the findings set forth in subdivisions A 1, A 2, and A 5 and (ii) finds that the applicant is employed by a person licensed under Chapter 16 (§

6.2-1600

et seq.).”

§ 6.2-1708.
Pre-licensing education of mortgage loan originators.

In order to meet the pre-licensing education requirement referred to in subdivision 3 of §

6.2-1707

, an applicant shall complete at least 20 hours of pre-licensing education courses, approved in accordance with subsection B, which shall include at least (i) three hours of federal law and regulations; (ii) three hours of ethics, which shall include instruction about fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues; and (iii) two hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

Pre-licensing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the Registry based upon reasonable standards. Review and approval of a course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the provision of any pre-licensing education course that has been approved by the Registry by: (i) the employer of the applicant; (ii) an entity that is affiliated with the applicant by any agency contract; or (iii) a subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or entity.

Pre-licensing education courses may be offered in a classroom, online, or by any other means approved by the Registry.

Except as otherwise provided by the Commission, pre-licensing education courses shall be subject to such expiration rules as may be established by the Registry. Expired courses shall not count toward the minimum number of hours of pre-licensing education required by subsection A.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.9; 2010, c. 794; 2019, c. 740.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 740 added subsection E.

§ 6.2-1709.
Testing of mortgage loan originator applicants.

In order to meet the written test requirement referred to in subdivision 4 of §

6.2-1707

, an individual shall pass, in accordance with reasonable standards established under this section, a qualified written test that has been developed by the Registry and administered by a test provider approved by the Registry.

A written test shall not be a qualified written test for purposes of subsection A unless the test adequately measures the applicant’s knowledge and comprehension in appropriate subject areas, including: (i) ethics; (ii) federal law and regulation pertaining to mortgage loan origination; (iii) state law pertaining to mortgage loan origination; and (iv) federal and state law and regulation pertaining to fraud, consumer protection, the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace, and fair lending issues.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a test provider approved by the Registry from providing a test at a location of: (i) the employer of the applicant; (ii) any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer; or (iii) any entity with which the applicant maintains an exclusive arrangement to act as a mortgage loan originator.

An individual shall not be considered to have passed a qualified written test unless he has correctly answered at least 75 percent of the test questions. An individual may take a test three consecutive times with each consecutive taking occurring at least 30 days after the preceding test. After failing three consecutive tests, an individual shall wait at least six months before retaking the test. A licensed mortgage loan originator who fails to maintain a valid license for a period of five years or longer, exclusive of any period during which such individual is a registered mortgage loan originator, shall retake the test and correctly answer at least 75 percent of the test questions.

An applicant who has successfully completed pre-licensing education and testing that is mandated by the Act and approved by the Registry for any state shall be deemed to have completed Virginia’s pre-licensing education and testing requirements, other than any limited or separate state testing requirements relating to Virginia law and regulation as described in subsection B.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.10; 2010, c. 794; 2012, cc. 52, 187.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 52 and 187 are identical, and substituted “section” for “subsection” in subsection A; and, in subsection D, substituted “take a test” for “retake a test” in the second sentence, and added “and correctly answer at least 75 percent of the test questions” at the end of the fourth sentence.

§ 6.2-1710.
Continuing education requirements.

A licensed mortgage loan originator shall complete annually at least eight hours of continuing education courses approved in accordance with subsection B, which shall include at least: (i) three hours related to federal law and regulations; (ii) two hours related to ethics, which shall include instruction about fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues; and (iii) two hours related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

Continuing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the Registry based upon reasonable standards. Review and approval of a continuing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the provision of any continuing education course that has been approved by the Registry by: (i) the employer of the mortgage loan originator; (ii) an entity that is affiliated with the mortgage loan originator by an agency contract; or (iii) a subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or entity.

Continuing education courses may be offered in a classroom, online, or by any means approved by the Registry.

A licensed mortgage loan originator may only receive credit for a continuing education course in the year in which the course is taken and may not take the same approved course in the same or successive years to meet the annual requirements for continuing education.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who is an instructor of an approved continuing education course may receive credit for his annual continuing education requirement at the rate of two hours of credit for every one hour of teaching.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who has successfully completed Registry-approved continuing education courses that satisfy the requirements of subsection A for any state shall be deemed to have satisfied the continuing education requirements of this chapter.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.11; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1711.
Licenses; places of business; changes.

Each license shall state fully the name and address of record of the licensee. Each licensee shall be required to display proof of licensing upon request, and to prominently display at any location where he acts as a mortgage loan originator the telephone numbers and Internet addresses for the Registry and the Commission where consumers and other interested parties may confirm the status of his license. Licenses shall not be transferable or assignable, by operation of law or otherwise. Except as otherwise provided by the Commission, no licensee shall use any name, in acting as a mortgage loan originator, other than the name set forth on the license issued by the Commission.

Every licensee shall within 10 days notify the Commissioner, in writing, of any change of residential or business address and provide such other information with respect to any such change as the Commissioner may reasonably require.

Every license shall remain in force until it expires or has been surrendered, revoked, or suspended. The expiration, surrender, revocation, or suspension of a license shall not affect any preexisting legal right or obligation of the licensee. In addition:

Except as otherwise provided by the Commission, licenses shall expire at the end of each calendar year. A licensee may request renewal by (i) filing a license renewal application through the Registry, (ii) paying the annual license renewal fee prescribed in §

6.2-1714

, (iii) obtaining the continuing education prescribed in §

6.2-1710

, and (iv) furnishing such other information as may be required by the Commission;

The Commission shall renew an individual’s license if the Commission finds that the individual has complied with the requirements of this chapter and continues to meet the conditions for initial licensure. If the Commission fails to make the findings required by this subdivision, the Commission shall not renew the individual’s license. In determining whether to renew a license, the Commission shall consider whether the licensee has violated state or federal law; and

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Commission may by regulation permit a former licensee to seek license reinstatement after the license expiration date by requesting renewal in accordance with subdivision 1 and paying a reinstatement fee as prescribed by the Commission.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.12; 2010, c. 794; 2012, cc. 52, 187.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 52 and 187 are identical, and added the exception at the beginning of the fourth sentence of subsection A, and rewrote subsection C.

§ 6.2-1712.
Repealed by Acts 2011, c. 435, cl. 3, effective July 1, 2012.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 435, cl. 2, provides: “That the State Corporation Commission shall not issue any provisional licenses in accordance with §

6.2-1712

of the Code of Virginia on or after July 1, 2011.”

Former §

6.2-1712

, pertaining to provisional mortgage loan originator licenses, derived from 2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.13; 2010, cc. 794, 831.

§ 6.2-1712.1.
Inactive mortgage loan originator licenses.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the Commission finds that an individual has applied for a mortgage loan originator license and meets all applicable requirements for licensure except §

6.2-1703

, then the Commission shall issue a mortgage loan originator license to the applicant. However, the license issued by the Commission shall be inactive by operation of law until the Commission has updated the licensee’s status in the Registry pursuant to subsection D.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the Commission finds that an individual has requested renewal of his mortgage loan originator license in accordance with subsection C of §

6.2-1711

and meets all applicable requirements for license renewal except §

6.2-1703

, then the Commission shall renew the individual’s mortgage loan originator license. However, the license renewed by the Commission shall be inactive by operation of law until the Commission has updated the licensee’s status in the Registry pursuant to subsection D.

If at any time a licensee ceases to be covered by a surety bond meeting the requirements of §

6.2-1703

, then the individual’s license shall be inactive by operation of law until the Commission has updated the licensee’s status in the Registry pursuant to subsection D.

If a licensee’s mortgage loan originator license is inactive by operation of law pursuant to this section, then the licensee shall not engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator until (i) the Commission has determined that the licensee is covered by a surety bond meeting the requirements of §

6.2-1703

and (ii) based upon its determination, the Commission has updated the licensee’s status in the Registry to indicate that the licensee may engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator.

History.

2016, c. 330; 2019, c. 740.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 740, in subsection D, deleted “or transitional mortgage loan originator license” preceding “is inactive.”

§ 6.2-1713.
Investigations; examinations.

The Commission may, by its designated officers and employees, as often as it deems necessary, investigate and examine the business activities, premises, and records of any individual required to be licensed under this chapter insofar as they pertain to any activities for which a license is required by this chapter. In the course of such investigations and examinations, the individual being investigated or examined shall, upon demand of the person making such investigation or examination, afford full access to all persons, premises, books, records, and information that the person making such investigation or examination deems necessary. For the foregoing purposes, the person making such investigation or examination shall have authority to administer oaths, examine under oath all the aforementioned individuals, and compel the production of papers and objects of all kinds.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.14; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1714.
Annual fees.

In order to defray the costs of his examination, supervision, and regulation, every licensee shall pay an annual license renewal fee. The fee shall be $100 unless another amount is prescribed by the Commission. The renewal fee shall be paid by the licensee to the State Treasurer or through the Registry, as determined by the Commission, on or before the end of each license year.

When it becomes necessary to examine or investigate the books and records of an individual required to be licensed under this chapter at a location outside the Commonwealth, the individual shall be liable for and shall pay to the Commission within 30 days of the presentation of an itemized statement, the actual travel and reasonable living expenses incurred on account of his examination, supervision, and regulation, or shall pay a reasonable per diem rate approved by the Commission. Any sums due pursuant to this subsection shall be in addition to the annual fee prescribed in subsection A.

If an individual is an employee or exclusive agent of a person licensed under Chapter 16 (§

6.2-1600

et seq.), the expenses referred to in subsection B shall be paid by the licensed mortgage lender or mortgage broker.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.15; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1715.
Advertising; use of a unique identifier.

No individual required to be licensed under this chapter shall use or cause to be published any advertisement that:

Contains any false, misleading, or deceptive statement or representation; or

Except as otherwise provided by the Commission, identifies a licensee by any name other than the name set forth on the license issued by the Commission.

No licensee shall use the unique identifier obtained from the Registry for any purpose other than the purposes of the Act and this chapter.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.16; 2010, c. 794; 2012, cc. 52, 187.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 52 and 187 are identical, and added the subsection A designator and subsection B, and added the exception at the beginning of subdivision A 2.